Maryland, session 2026, HB0387.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
13–230.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “STATE PUBLIC ART” MEANS PUBLIC ART
COMMISSIONED FOR A PROJECT THAT RECEIVES STATE FUNDING, REGARDLESS OF
WHETHER THE STATE FUNDING DIRECTLY PAID FOR THE PUBLIC ART.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0387*

HOUSE BILL 387
(B) (1) AN ENTITY MAY NOT INCLUDE IN A CONTRACT FOR STATE PUBLIC
ART A REQUIREMENT THAT AN ARTIST WAIVE COPYRIGHT PROTECTIONS OR RIGHTS
UNDER 17 U.S.C. § 106A.
(2) NOTWITHSTANDING PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, AND
SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, AN ARTIST MAY CHOOSE TO
WAIVE THE ARTIST’S COPYRIGHT PROTECTIONS OR RIGHTS UNDER 17 U.S.C. § 106A
IN A CONTRACT FOR STATE PUBLIC ART.
(3) A WAIVER DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION
MUST BE IN WRITING.
(C) AN ENTITY THAT COMMISSIONS STATE PUBLIC ART SHALL REGISTER
THE ART WITH THE MARYLAND STATE ARTS COUNCIL, INCLUDING:
(1) THE NAME AND CONTACT INFORMATION OF THE ARTIST;
(2) THE LOCATION OF THE ART;
(3) THE TYPE OF ART;
(4) THE TITLE OF THE ART; AND
(5) THE DATE OF INSTALLATION OR CREATION.
(D) THE MARYLAND STATE ARTS COUNCIL SHALL ESTABLISH, MAINTAIN,
AND UPDATE A PUBLICLY AVAILABLE DATABASE OF ART REGISTERED UNDER
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION ON ITS WEBSITE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to any contract entered into before the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.